Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska50-448
Attorney General; duties; powers.

(1) It is the intent of the Legislature that the Attorney General perform, acquire, and otherwise cause to be made available such research as may be appropriate to inform and assist the Agriculture Committee of the Legislature in identifying policy instruments available to the Legislature and the people of Nebraska, including, as appropriate, but not necessarily requiring or limited to, modification of Article XII, section 8, of the Constitution of Nebraska, in order to foster and enhance legal, social, and economic conditions in Nebraska consistent with and which advance those state interests that exist in the structure, development, and progress of agricultural production in Nebraska.

(2) The Attorney General may contract with experts in the fields of agricultural economics, agricultural law, commerce clause jurisprudence, and other areas of study and practice to assist the Attorney General in carrying out the intent of the Legislature under this section.

Laws 2007, LB516, § 3.